North Carolina statutes. Chapter 162. Sheriff.
Article 4. County Prisoners.
§ 162-58.
Counties may work prisoners.

The board of commissioners of the several counties may enact by resolution all necessary rules and regulations for work on projects to benefit units of State or local government by persons convicted of misdemeanors or felonies and imprisoned in the local confinement facilities or satellite jail/work release units of their respective counties. The sheriff shall approve rules and regulations enacted by the board. Prisoners working under this section shall be supervised by county employees or by the sheriff. The rules enacted by the board of county commissioners and approved by the sheriff shall specify a procedure for ensuring that county employees supervising prisoners pursuant to this section be provided with notice that the persons placed under their supervision are inmates from a local confinement facility or a satellite jail/work release unit.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 841, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 54.

Increased Misdemeanant Confinement Reimbursement Rate if Utilizing Inmate Labor.

Session Laws 2021-180, ss. 19.10(a)-(f). provide: “(a) Notwithstanding

G.S. 162-58

, and consistent with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 148 of the General Statutes, sheriffs having custody of inmates under the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program may utilize those inmates to maintain the cleanliness of areas along local and State roadways.

“(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“(1) Road mile. – A section of roadside equaling 1 mile in length, not including any roadsides that are parallel to that section.

“(2) Work hour. – An hour worked by an individual inmate, including time spent traveling to and from work sites and break time taken during work efforts.

“(c) A sheriff that utilizes inmates pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall coordinate with the Department of Transportation before and after a cleanup project to ensure that cleanup efforts are not unnecessarily duplicated by either the sheriff's office or the Department of Transportation. The sheriff shall also ensure that all inmates utilized pursuant to this subsection are appropriately guarded while working and that food, water, and bathroom facilities are accessible in reasonable amounts and times.

“(d) A sheriff that utilizes inmate labor pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for a combined total of 500 work hours in one calendar month shall submit a record documenting those work hours and the corresponding road miles to the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association and shall be reimbursed by the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program for caring for and housing the inmates of the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program at a rate of at least sixty dollars ($60.00) per day, per inmate held under the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program for each calendar month in which 500 work hours were completed. Participating sheriffs shall comply with all requirements established by the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program necessary to certify the hours worked and to confirm funding availability. This increased reimbursement rate shall be paid to participating sheriffs only until the funds that have been specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose are exhausted. Funds allocated under this section shall not revert but shall be available until expended.

“(e) The North Carolina Sheriffs' Association shall report no later than the fifteenth day of each month to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division regarding (i) the counties with sheriffs' offices that utilized inmate labor pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, (ii) the number of total work hours performed by inmates in each participating county, and (iii) the number of road miles cleaned by inmates in each participating county.

“(f) The North Carolina Sheriffs' Association shall report no later than October 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and the chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee regarding (i) the counties with sheriffs' offices that utilized inmate labor pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, (ii) the number of total work hours performed by inmates in each participating county, and (iii) the number of road miles cleaned by inmates in each participating county.”

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 162-59.
Person having custody to approve prisoners for work.

No prisoner shall perform work pursuant to

G.S. 162-58

unless the prisoner has been approved for the work by the person having custody of the prisoner. The decision to approve a prisoner for work shall be based on the prisoner’s history of violence, if any, past criminal convictions, and current sentence. For purposes of this section, the person having custody of the prisoner is the sheriff, except that when the prisoner is confined in a district confinement facility the person having custody of the prisoner is the jail administrator. The person having custody of the prisoner may use his discretion to revoke his approval at any time and to return the prisoner to the local confinement facility or satellite jail/work release unit. Neither the person having custody of the prisoner nor any jailer may be held liable for the actions of any prisoner, including those actions committed during and after the escape of a prisoner, while the prisoner is outside their supervision pursuant to this section.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 841, s. 1.

§ 162-59.1.
Person having custody to approve prisoners for participation in education and other programs.

The person having custody of a prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor offense may approve that prisoner’s participation in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or in any other education, rehabilitation, or training program. The person having custody of the prisoner may revoke this approval at any time. For purposes of this section, the person having custody of the prisoner is the sheriff, except that when the prisoner is confined in a district confinement facility the person having custody of the prisoner is the jail administrator.

History.

2001-200, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 28(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 28(h), effective August 11, 2014, substituted “an adult high school equivalency diploma program” for “a general education development diploma program (GED program)” in the first sentence.

§ 162-60.
Reduction in sentence allowed for work, education, and other programs. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A prisoner who has faithfully performed the duties assigned to the prisoner under

G.S. 162-58

is entitled to a reduction in the prisoner’s sentence of four days for each 30 days of work performed.

A prisoner who is convicted of a misdemeanor offense and housed in a local confinement facility or a person under the age of 18 convicted of a misdemeanor offense and housed in a detention facility approved by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice who faithfully participates in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or in any other education, rehabilitation, or training program is entitled to a reduction in the prisoner’s sentence of four days for each 30 days of classes attended, up to the maximum credit allowed under G.S. 15A-1340.20(d).

The person having custody of the prisoner, as defined in

G.S. 162-59

, is the sole judge as to whether the prisoner has faithfully performed the assigned duties under

G.S. 162-58

or has faithfully participated in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or other education, rehabilitation, or training program under subsection (b) of this section. A prisoner who escapes or attempts to escape while performing work pursuant to

G.S. 162-58

or while participating in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or other education, rehabilitation, or training program shall forfeit any reduction in sentence that the prisoner would have been entitled to under this section.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 841, s. 1; 1993, c. 538, s. 36; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 2; 2001-200, s. 2; 2014-115, s. 28(i); 2020-83, s. 8(o).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 162-60

.

§ 162-60.
Reduction in sentence allowed for work, education, and other programs. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A prisoner who has faithfully performed the duties assigned to the prisoner under

G.S. 162-58

is entitled to a reduction in the prisoner’s sentence of four days for each 30 days of work performed.

A prisoner who is convicted of a misdemeanor offense and housed in a local confinement facility or a person under the age of 18 convicted of a misdemeanor offense and housed in a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice who faithfully participates in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or in any other education, rehabilitation, or training program is entitled to a reduction in the prisoner’s sentence of four days for each 30 days of classes attended, up to the maximum credit allowed under G.S. 15A-1340.20(d).

The person having custody of the prisoner, as defined in

G.S. 162-59

, is the sole judge as to whether the prisoner has faithfully performed the assigned duties under

G.S. 162-58

or has faithfully participated in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or other education, rehabilitation, or training program under subsection (b) of this section. A prisoner who escapes or attempts to escape while performing work pursuant to

G.S. 162-58

or while participating in an adult high school equivalency diploma program or other education, rehabilitation, or training program shall forfeit any reduction in sentence that the prisoner would have been entitled to under this section.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 841, s. 1; 1993, c. 538, s. 36; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 2; 2001-200, s. 2; 2014-115, s. 28(i); 2020-83, s. 8(o); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 162-60

.

§ 162-61.
Liability of county.

The county working prisoners pursuant to

G.S. 162-58

shall remain liable for emergency medical services for those prisoners pursuant to

G.S. 153A-224

while the prisoners are working. The county working the prisoners shall be liable to third parties for injuries incurred by the third parties through the negligence of the working prisoners to the same extent as the county is liable for the actions of its employees. Chapters 96 and 97 of the General Statutes shall have no application to prisoners working pursuant to

G.S. 162-58

.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 841, s. 1.

§ 162-62.
Legal status of prisoners.

When any person charged with a felony or an impaired driving offense is confined for any period in a county jail, local confinement facility, district confinement facility, or satellite jail/work release unit, the administrator or other person in charge of the facility shall attempt to determine if the prisoner is a legal resident of the United States by an inquiry of the prisoner, or by examination of any relevant documents, or both.

If the administrator or other person in charge of the facility is unable to determine if that prisoner is a legal resident or citizen of the United States or its territories, the administrator or other person in charge of the facility holding the prisoner, where possible, shall make a query of Immigration and Customs Enforcement of the United States Department of Homeland Security. If the prisoner has not been lawfully admitted to the United States, the United States Department of Homeland Security will have been notified of the prisoner’s status and confinement at the facility by its receipt of the query from the facility.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny bond to a prisoner or to prevent a prisoner from being released from confinement when that prisoner is otherwise eligible for release.

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-97, s. 12, effective July 20, 2010.

History.

2007-494, s. 1; 2010-97, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-97, s. 12, effective July 20, 2010, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, deleted “through the Division of Criminal Information (DCI) system to the Law Enforcement Support Center (LESC)” following “shall make a query,” and in the last sentence, deleted “the LESC determines that” following “If” and “DCI” preceding “query from”; and deleted subsection (d), which read: “The administrator or other person in charge of the facility shall annually report the number of queries performed under subsection (b) of this section and the results of those queries to the Governor’s Crime Commission of the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety. The Governor’s Crime Commission shall make the reports available to the public.”